California, session 20252026, AB2311.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 2401 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:2401. (a) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated primarily for the purpose of medical education by a public or private nonprofit university medical school, which is approved by the board or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, may charge for professional services rendered to teaching patients by licensees who hold academic appointments on the faculty of the university, if the charges are approved by the physician and surgeon in whose name the charges are made.(b) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated under subdivision (p) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the clinic shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(c) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a narcotic treatment program operated under Section 11876 of the Health and Safety Code and regulated by the State Department of Health Care Services, may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the narcotic treatment program shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(d) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a hospital that is owned and operated by a licensed charitable organization, that offers only pediatric subspecialty care, that, before January 1, 2013, employed licensees on a salary basis, and that has not charged for professional services rendered to patients may, commencing January 1, 2013, charge for professional services rendered to patients, provided the following conditions are met:(1) The hospital does not increase the number of salaried licensees by more than five licensees each year.(2) The hospital does not expand its scope of services beyond pediatric subspecialty care.(3) The hospital accepts each patient needing its scope of services regardless of the patient’s ability to pay, including whether the patient has any form of health care coverage.(4) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.(5) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(e) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a federally certified critical access hospital may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees to patients, provided both of the following conditions are met:(1) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.(2) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(f) (1) Until January 1, 2037, and notwithstanding Section 2400, a health care district, organized and governed pursuant to Division 23 (commencing with Section 32000) of the Health and Safety Code, or a nonprofit corporation with a health care district as its sole corporate member, as described in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (h) of Section 14169.31 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, that owns or controls a general acute care hospital may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees, provided all of the following conditions are met:(A) The hospital is a licensed acute care hospital, as defined in subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 1250 of the Health and Safety Code, and satisfies either of the following conditions:(i) Was awarded a loan under the Distressed Hospital Loan Program (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 129380) of Part 6 of Division 107 of the Health and Safety Code) before January 1, 2025.(ii) (I) Has a combined Medicare and Medi-Cal payor mix greater than 75 percent, as determined using the adjusted patient days from the Department of Health Care Access and Information annual financial disclosure report, and as recorded and calculated as of January 1, 2025, pursuant to the Department of Health Care Access and Information guidance.(II) For purposes of qualifying based on payor mix of Medicare and Medi-Cal pursuant to this clause, both the hospital and the health care system to which it belongs, if any, shall have a payor mix of greater than 75 percent. (A)(B) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote, pursuant to the medical staff bylaws, that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.(B)(C) The health care district or nonprofit corporation, and any hospital under its ownership or control, shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon.(C)(D) The licensee positions employed by the health care district or nonprofit corporation are in addition to, and do not supplant, any licensee positions providing professional services as a member of the medical staff at any hospitals owned or controlled by the health care district or nonprofit corporation, as of January 1, 2026. This subparagraph does not prohibit a health care district or nonprofit corporation from negotiating or amending existing contracts for professional services upon mutual agreement of the parties to the contract.(D)(E) The health care district or nonprofit corporation shall affirmatively offer a licensee who is a prospective employee the option to contract with the facility in lieu of employment.(2) Commencing January 1, 2028, a health care district or nonprofit corporation, that is employing licensees and charging for professional services rendered by those licensees to patients under this subdivision shall publish on its internet website, on or before July 1 of each year, a report for any year in which that health care district or nonprofit corporation has employed or is employing licensees and charging for professional services rendered by those licensees to patients. The report shall include data about the ability of general acute care hospitals under the health care district’s or nonprofit corporation’s ownership and control to recruit and retain physicians and surgeons during the prior year, as well as the total number of physicians and surgeons recruited and retained to date since January 1, 2027, reported separately by employment and contracted positions.(g) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2037, and, as of January 1, 2038, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 2401 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:2401. (a) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated primarily for the purpose of medical education by a public or private nonprofit university medical school, which is approved by the board or the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, may charge for professional services rendered to teaching patients by licensees who hold academic appointments on the faculty of the university, if the charges are approved by the physician and surgeon in whose name the charges are made.(b) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a clinic operated under subdivision (p) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the clinic shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(c) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a narcotic treatment program operated under Section 11876 of the Health and Safety Code and regulated by the State Department of Health Care Services, may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees. However, the narcotic treatment program shall not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct the professional judgment of a physician and surgeon in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(d) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a hospital that is owned and operated by a licensed charitable organization, that offers only pediatric subspecialty care, that, before January 1, 2013, employed licensees on a salary basis, and that has not charged for professional services rendered to patients may, commencing January 1, 2013, charge for professional services rendered to patients, provided the following conditions are met:(1) The hospital does not increase the number of salaried licensees by more than five licensees each year.(2) The hospital does not expand its scope of services beyond pediatric subspecialty care.(3) The hospital accepts each patient needing its scope of services regardless of the patient’s ability to pay, including whether the patient has any form of health care coverage.(4) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.(5) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(e) Notwithstanding Section 2400, a federally certified critical access hospital may employ licensees and charge for professional services rendered by those licensees to patients, provided both of the following conditions are met:(1) The medical staff concur by an affirmative vote that the licensee’s employment is in the best interest of the communities served by the hospital.(2) The hospital does not interfere with, control, or otherwise direct a physician and surgeon’s professional judgment in a manner prohibited by Section 2400 or any other law.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2037.